Nebraska, session 109, LB292A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB292A LB292A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $250,000 from the Middle
Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $-0- from
the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Department of Economic Development, for Program 601, to aid in carrying
out the provisions of Legislative Bill 292, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
-2-